en: Blueberry juices from concentrate
de: Heidelbeersäfte aus Konzentrat, Blaubeersäfte aus Konzentrat
es: Zumos de arándanos procedente de concentrado
fi: Mustikkamehutiivisteet
fr: Jus de myrtilles à base de concentré
hr: Sokovi od borovnice iz koncentrata
it: Succo di mirtillo da concentrato
lt: Koncentruotos mėlynių sultys, Mėlynių sultys iš koncentrato
nl: Blauwe bessensappen op basis van concentraat, Blauwe bessensap op basis van concentraat

en: Squeezed blueberry juices, Non-refrigerated squeezed blueberry juices
de: Heidelbeerdirektsäfte, Blaubeerdirektsäfte
es: Zumos de arándanos exprimidos, Zumos de arándanos exprimidos no refrigerados, Zumos de arándanos exprimidos ambiente
fi: Puristetut mustikkamehut
fr: Jus de myrtilles pur jus
hr: Cijeđeni sokovi od borovnice
nl: Geperste blauwe bessensappen, Geperste blauwe bessensap

en: Fruit juices from concentrate
ca: Suc de fruita concentrat
de: Fruchtsäfte aus Konzentrat
es: Zumos procedentes de concentrado
fi: Mehutiivisteet
fr: Jus de fruits à base de concentré, jus de fruit à base de concentré, jus de fruits à base de concentrés
he: מיצי פירות מרוכזים, תרכיזי פירות, תרכיזי פרות, תרכיזים מפירות, מיצים מרוכזים מפירות
hr: Voćni sokovi iz koncentrata
hu: Gyümölcslevek sűrítményből, Gyümölcslé sűrítményből, Gyümölcslé koncentrátumból
it: Succo di frutta da concentrato
lt: Koncentruotos vaisių sultys, Vaisių sultys iš koncentrato
nl: Vruchtensappen op basis van concentraat, Vruchtensap op basis van concentraat
pl: Zagęszczone soki owocowe
pt: Sumos de fruta concentrados

en: Grape juices
bg: Сок от грозде
de: Traubensäfte, Traubensaft
es: Zumos de uva, Zumos de uvas
fi: rypälemehut
fr: Jus de raisin, jus de raisins
hr: Sokovi od grožđa
hu: Szőlőlé
it: Succo di uva
ja: ブドウジュース, ぶどうジュース, グレープジュース
lt: Vynuogių sultys
nl: Druivensappen, Druivensap
pl: Soki winogronowe, Sok winogronowy, Soki z winogron
zh: 葡萄汁

en: Squeezed grape juices, Non-refrigerated squeezed grape juices, Pure grape juice
de: Traubendirektsäfte
es: Zumos de uva exprimidos no refrigerados, Zumos de uva exprimidos, Zumos de uva exprimidos ambiente
fr: Jus de raisin pur jus
hr: Cijeđeni sokovi od grožđa
hu: Préselt szőlőlé
lt: Grynos vynuogių sultys, Spaustų vynuogių sultys
nl: Pure Druivensappen, Pure Druivensap

en: Grape juices from concentrate, Grape juices reconstituted from a concentrate
de: Traubensäfte aus Konzentrat, Traubensaft aus Konzentrat
es: Zumos de uva procedente de concentrado
fr: Jus de raisin à base de concentré, Jus de raisins à base de concentré
hr: Sokovi od grožđa iz koncentrata
hu: Szőlőlé koncentrátumból, Szőlőlé sűrítményből
it: Succo di uva da concentrato
lt: Koncentruotos vynuogių sultys, Vynuogių sultys iš koncentrato
nl: Druivensappen uit concentraat, Druivensap uit concentraat

en: Red grape juices
de: Rotweinsäfte
es: Zumos de uva roja
fr: Jus de raisin rouge
hr: Sokovi od crvenog grožđa
hu: Kékszőlőlé
nl: Rode druivensappen

en: White grape juices
bg: Бели гроздови сокове
de: Weißweinsäfte
es: Zumos de uva blanca
fi: Valkoiset rypälemehut
fr: Jus de raisin blanc
hr: Sokovi od bijelog grožđa
hu: Fehérszőlőlé
it: Succo di uva bianca
ja: 白ぶどうジュース
lt: Baltų vynuogių sultys
nl: Witte druivensappen
pl: Soki z białych winogron
ru: Белые виноградные соки

en: Grapefruit juices
bg: Сок от грейпфрут
de: Grapefruitsäfte
es: Zumos de pomelo, zumos de toronja
fi: greippimehut
fr: Jus de pamplemousse, jus de pamplemousses
hr: Sokovi od grejpa
hu: Grépfrútlevek, Grépfrútlé, Grapefruitlé
it: Succo di pompelmo
ja: グレープフルーツジュース
lt: Greipfrutų sultys
nl: Grapefruitsappen, Grapefruitsap
pl: Soki grejpfrutowe, Soki z grejpfruta
ru: Сок грейпфрутовый, грейпфрутовый сок

en: Grapefruit juices from concentrate, Grapefruit juice reconstituted from a concentrate
de: Grapefruitsäfte aus Konzentrat
es: Zumos de pomelo procedente de concentrado
fr: Jus de pamplemousse à base de concentré, jus de pamplemousses à base de concentré, jus de pamplemousse à base de jus concentré
hr: Sokovi od grejpa iz koncentrata
hu: Grépfrútlé koncentrátumból, Grépfrútlé sűrítményből
it: Succhi d'uva concentrati
lt: Koncentruotos greipfrutų sultys, Greipfrutų sultys iš koncentrato
nl: Grapefruitsappen uit concentraat, Grapefruitsap uit concentraat
ru: Сок грейпфрутовый концентрированный, концентрированный грейпфрутовый сок

en: Fresh grapefruit juice, Refrigerated squeezed grapefruit juices
de: Gekühlte Grapefruitdirektsäfte, Frische Grapefruitdirektsäfte
es: Zumos de pomelo exprimido refrigerados
fr: Jus de pamplemousse frais, Jus de pamplemousses frais
hr: Svježi sok od grejpa
hu: Friss grépfrútlé
lt: Šaltai laikomos spaustos sultys
nl: Verse grapefruitsappen, Verse grapefruitsap

en: Home-made grapefruit juice
de: Hausgemachter Grapefruitsaft
es: Zumo de pomelo casero
fr: Jus de pamplemousse maison
hr: Domaći sok od grejpa
it: Succo di pompelmo fatto in casa
lt: Namų gamybos greipfrutų sultys
nl: Huisgemaakte grapefruitsap

en: Squeezed grapefruit juices, Non-refrigerated squeezed grapefruit juices
de: Grapefruitdirektsäfte
es: Zumos de pomelo exprimidos no refrigerados, Zumos de pomelo exprimido, Zumos de pomelo exprimido ambiente
fi: puristetut greippimehut
fr: Jus de pamplemousse pur jus, jus de pamplemousse 100% pur jus, Jus de pamplemousses 100% pur jus, 100% pur jus de pamplemousses
hr: Cijeđeni sokovi od grejpa
hu: Préselt grépfrútlé
it: Spremuta di pompelmo
lt: Spaustos greipfrutų sultys

en: Pink grapefruit juices
de: Pink Grapefruit Säfte
fr: Jus de pamplemousse rose, Jus de pamplemousses roses
hr: Sokovi od ružičastog grejpa
nl: Roze grapefruitsappen, Roze grapefruitsap

en: Multifruit juices
ca: Suc multifruites
de: Multifruchtsäfte
es: Zumos multifruta, Zumos multifrutas
fi: Monihedelmämehut
fr: Jus multifruits, Jus multifruit
hr: Multivoćni sokovi
hu: Vegyes gyümölcslevek, Vegyes gyümölcslé, Multivitamin levek
it: Succhi multifrutta
lt: Įvairių vaisių sultys
nl: Multi-vruchtensappen, Multi-vruchtensap
pl: Soki wieloowocowe
pt: Sumos de várias frutas
ru: Мультифруктовые соки

en: Mixed fruits pure multivitamin juice
fr: Jus multifruit pur jus multivitaminé
hr: Miješano voće čisti multivitaminski sok
lt: Įvairių vaisių sultys su multivitaminais

en: Orange based mixed fruits multivitamin juice
fr: Jus multifruit multivitaminé à base d'orange

en: Multifruit juices from concentrate, Multivitamin mixed fruits juice reconstituted from a concentrate
de: Multifruchtsäfte aus Konzentrat
es: Zumos multifruta procedente de concentrado
fi: tiivistetyt monihedelmämehut
fr: Jus multifruits à base de concentrés, jus multifruits à base de jus concentré, Jus multifruit à base de concentré
hr: Multivoćni sokovi iz koncentrata
hu: Vegyes gyümölcslevek koncentrátumból, Vegyes gyümölcslé koncentrátumból, Vegyes gyümölcslé sűrítményből
it: Succhi di frutta concentrati, Succhi multifrutti congelati
lt: Koncentruotos įvairių vaisių sultys, Įvairių vaisių sultys iš koncentrato, Įvairių vaisių sultys iš koncentrato su multivitaminais
nl: Multivruchtensappen uit concentraat, Multivruchtensap uit concentraat

en: Squeezed multifruit juices, Mixed fruits pure juices, Non-refrigerated squeezed multifruit juices
de: Multifruchtdirektsäfte
es: Zumos multifruta exprimidos no refrigerados, Zumos multifruta exprimidos, Zumos multifruta exprimidos ambiente
fi: puristetut monihedelmämehut
fr: Jus multifruits pur jus
hr: Cijeđeni sokovi od više voća
hu: Préselt vegyes gyümöcslevek, Facsart vegyes gyümölcslevek
nl: Verse Multivruchtensappen, Verse Multivruchtensap

en: Multifruit juices with coconut water
fr: Jus multifruits à l'eau de coco